Mississippi, session 2026, SB2809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 45-9-133, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-9-133.  Each person employed as a law enforcement officer by the Mississippi Department of Transportation and the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau who retires for superannuation or for reason of disability under the Public Employees' Retirement System shall be allowed to retain as his or her personal property, including, one (1) sidearm which was issued to such law enforcement officer. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.